Hawaii statutes.
Note

Part II heading, "Civil Service for the State",
repealed. L 2000, c 253, §8.

§76-11 Definitions. As used in this
chapter, unless the context clearly requires otherwise:

"Appointing authority" means a
department head or designee having the power to make appointments or changes in
the status of employees.

"Chief executive" means the governor,
the respective mayors, the chief justice of the supreme court, and the chief
executive officer of the Hawaii health systems corporation. It may include the
superintendent of education and the president of the University of Hawaii with
respect to their employees on any matter that applies to employees in general,
including employees who are not covered by this chapter.

"Civil service" includes all positions
within a jurisdiction that are not exempted by section 46-33, 76-16, or 76-77,
or by other law and must be filled through civil service recruitment procedures
based on merit.

"Civil service employee" means an
employee who has met all requirements for membership in the civil service under
section 76-27.

"Class" means a group of positions
that reflect sufficiently similar duties and responsibilities such that the
same title and the same pay range may apply to each position allocated to the
class.

"Classification system" means classes
of positions arranged in a logical and systematic order.

"Day" means a calendar day unless
otherwise specified.

"Department" means any department,
board, commission, or agency of a jurisdiction.

"Director" means the head of the
central personnel agency for a jurisdiction regardless of title, whether it is
the director of human resources development, director of personnel, director of
personnel services, or personnel director.

"Employee" or "public
employee" means any person holding a position in the service of a
jurisdiction, irrespective of status or type of appointment; provided that, if
the context clearly applies only to an employee who is a member of the civil
service, "employee" means a civil service employee.

"Employer" or "public
employer" means the governor in the case of the State, the respective
mayors in the case of the counties, the chief justice of the supreme court in
the case of the judiciary, the board of education in the case of the department
of education, the board of regents in the case of the University of Hawaii, the
Hawaii health systems corporation board in the case of the Hawaii health
systems corporation, and any individual who represents one of the employers or
acts in their interest in dealing with public employees. In the case of the
judiciary, the administrative director of the courts shall be the employer in
lieu of the chief justice for purposes which the chief justice determines would
be prudent or necessary to avoid conflict.

"Exclusive representative" means the
employee organization certified by the board under section 89-8 as the
collective bargaining agent to represent all employees in an appropriate
bargaining unit without discrimination and without regard to employee
organization membership.

"Jurisdiction" means the State, the
city and county of Honolulu, the county of Hawaii, the county of Maui, the
county of Kauai, the judiciary, the department of education, the University of
Hawaii, and the Hawaii health systems corporation.

"Legislative body" means the
legislature in the case of the State, including the judiciary, the department
of education, the University of Hawaii, and the Hawaii health systems
corporation; the city council in the case of the city and county of Honolulu; and
the respective county councils in the case of the counties of Hawaii, Maui, and
Kauai.

"Merit appeals board" means a
jurisdiction's appellate body for purposes of section 76-14 regardless of
whether it is named merit appeals board, civil service commission, or appeals
board.

"Position" means a specific job
requiring the full or part-time employment of one person. [L 1955, c 274, pt of
§1; RL 1955, §3-11; am L Sp 1959 2d, c 1, §11; am L 1965, c 54, §1; HRS §76-11;
am L 1974, c 159, §10; gen ch 1985; am L 1994, c 56, §21; am L 2000, c 253, §9]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next